Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.065, is amended to read: 609.065 JUSTIFIABLE deleted text begin TAKING OF LIFEdeleted text end new text begin USE OF DEADLY FORCE IN DEFENSE OF HOME AND PERSONnew text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end deleted text begin The intentional taking of the life of another is not authorized by section 609.06, except when necessary in resisting or preventing an offense which the actor reasonably believes exposes the actor or another to great bodily harm or death, or preventing the commission of a felony in the actor's place of abodedeleted text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given themnew text end . new text begin (b) "Court order" means an order for protection issued under section 518B.01, a restraining order issued under section 609.748, a no contact order issued under section 629.75, or a substantively similar order issued by any court in this state, another state, the United States, or any subordinate jurisdiction of the United States. new text end new text begin (c) "Deadly force" means force used by an individual with the purpose of causing, or which the individual should reasonably know creates a substantial risk of causing, great bodily harm or death. The intentional discharge of a firearm by an individual at another person, or at a vehicle in which another person is believed to be, constitutes deadly force. A threat to cause great bodily harm or death, by the production of a weapon or otherwise, constitutes reasonable force and not deadly force, when the individual's objective is limited to creating an expectation that the individual will use deadly force only if authorized by law. new text end new text begin (d) "Dwelling" means a building defined under section 609.556, subdivision 3, an overnight stopping accommodation of any kind, or a place of abode, that an individual temporarily or permanently is occupying or intending to occupy as a habitation or home. A dwelling includes but is not limited to a building or conveyance and that building's or conveyance's curtilage and any attached or adjacent deck, porch, appurtenance, or other structure, whether the building or conveyance is used temporarily or permanently for these purposes, is mobile or immobile, or is a motor vehicle, watercraft, motor home, tent, or the equivalent. new text end new text begin (e) "Forcible felony" means any crime punishable by imprisonment exceeding one year the elements of which include the use or threatened use of physical force or a deadly weapon against the person of another, including but not limited to: murder in the first degree under section 609.185; murder in the second degree under section 609.19; manslaughter in the first degree under section 609.20; assault in the first degree under section 609.221; assault in the second degree under section 609.222; assault in the third degree under section 609.223; criminal sexual conduct in the first degree under section 609.342; criminal sexual conduct in the second degree under section 609.343; arson in the first degree under section 609.561; burglary in the first, second, and third degrees under section 609.582; robbery under sections 609.24 and 609.245; and kidnapping under section 609.25. new text end new text begin (f) "Good faith" includes honesty in fact in the conduct of the act concerned. new text end new text begin (g) "Great bodily harm" has the meaning given in section 609.02, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (h) "Imminent" means the actor infers from all the facts and circumstances that the course of conduct has commenced. new text end new text begin (i) "Substantial bodily harm" has the meaning given in section 609.02, subdivision 7a. new text end new text begin (j) "Vehicle" means a conveyance of any type. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Circumstances when authorized. new text end new text begin (a) The use of deadly force by an individual is justified under this section when the act is undertaken: new text end new text begin (1) to resist or prevent the commission of a felony in the individual's dwelling; new text end new text begin (2) to resist or prevent what the individual reasonably believes is an offense or attempted offense that imminently exposes the individual or another person to substantial bodily harm, great bodily harm, or death; or new text end new text begin (3) to resist or prevent what the individual reasonably believes is the commission or imminent commission of a forcible felony. new text end new text begin (b) The use of deadly force is not authorized under this section if the individual knows that the person against whom force is being used is a licensed peace officer from this state, another state, the United States, or any subordinate jurisdiction of the United States, who is acting lawfully. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Degree of force; retreat. new text end new text begin An individual taking defensive action pursuant to subdivision 2 may use all force and means, including deadly force, that the individual in good faith believes is required to succeed in defense. The individual may meet force with superior force when the individual's objective is defensive; the individual is not required to retreat; and the individual may continue defensive actions against an assailant until the danger has ended. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Presumptions. new text end new text begin (a) An individual using deadly force is presumed to possess a reasonable belief that there exists an imminent threat of substantial bodily harm, great bodily harm, or death to the individual or another person, if the individual knows or has reason to know that: new text end new text begin (1) the person against whom the defensive action is being taken is unlawfully entering or attempting to enter by force or by stealth, or has unlawfully entered by force or by stealth and remains within, the dwelling or occupied vehicle of the individual; or new text end new text begin (2) the person against whom the defensive action is being taken is in the process of removing, or attempting to remove, the individual or another person from the dwelling or occupied vehicle of the individual. new text end new text begin (b) An individual is not entitled to the benefit of the presumption in paragraph (a) if the individual knows that the person against whom the defensive action is being taken: new text end new text begin (1) is a lawful resident of the dwelling or a lawful possessor of the vehicle, or is otherwise lawfully permitted to enter the dwelling or vehicle; or new text end new text begin (2) is a person who has lawful custody of the person being removed from the dwelling or vehicle or whose removal from the dwelling or vehicle is being attempted. A person who is prohibited by a court order from contacting another individual or from entering a dwelling or possessing a vehicle of another individual is not a lawful resident of that individual's dwelling and is not a lawful possessor of that individual's vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) An individual using defensive force is not entitled to the benefit of the presumption in paragraph (a) if the individual is presently engaged in a crime or attempting to escape from the scene of a crime, or is presently using the dwelling or occupied vehicle in furtherance of a crime. new text end new text begin (d) An individual is not entitled to the benefit of the presumption in paragraph (a) if the individual knows or has reason to know that the person against whom the defensive action is being taken is a licensed peace officer from this state, another state, the United States, or any subordinate jurisdiction of the United States, who is acting lawfully. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Criminal investigation; immunity from prosecution. new text end new text begin (a) An individual who uses force, including deadly force, according to this section or as otherwise provided by law in defense of the individual, the individual's dwelling, or another individual is justified in using such force and is immune from any criminal prosecution for that act. new text end new text begin (b) A law enforcement agency may arrest an individual using force under circumstances described in this section only after considering any claims or circumstances supporting self-defense or lawful defense of another individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Justifiable use of force; burden of proof. new text end new text begin In a criminal trial, when there is any evidence of justifiable use of force under this section or section 609.06, the state has the burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant's actions were not justifiable. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Short title. new text end new text begin This section may be cited as the "Defense of Dwelling and Person Act of 2025." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to uses of deadly force occurring on or after that date. new text end